Colorado statutes. TITLE 1 Elections
PART 5
NOTICE AND PREPARATION FOR ELECTIONS

1-13.5-501. Call for nominations - definitions.

Between seventy-five and one hundred days before a regular local government election, the designated election official shall provide public notice of a call for nominations for the election. The call must state the director offices to be voted upon at the election, where a self-nomination and acceptance form or letter may be obtained, the deadline for submitting the self-nomination and acceptance form or letter to the designated election official, and information on obtaining an absentee ballot.

(1.5) Except as otherwise required by subsection (1.7) of this section, the public notice required by subsection (1) of this section must be made by publication as defined by subsection (2) of this section and by any one of the following means:

Mailing the notice, at the lowest cost option, to each address at which one or more active registered electors of the local government resides as specified in the registration list provided by the county clerk and recorder as of the date that is one hundred fifty days prior to the date of the regular local government election;

Including the notice as a prominent part of a newsletter, annual report, billing insert, billing statement, letter, voter information card or other notice of election, or other informational mailing sent by the local government to the eligible electors of the local government;

Posting the information on the official website of the local government; or

For a local government with fewer than one thousand eligible electors that is wholly located within a county the population of which is less than thirty thousand people, posting the notice in at least three public places within the territorial boundaries of the local government and, in addition, posting a notice in the office of the clerk and recorder of the county in which the local government is located. Any such notices must remain posted until the day after the call for nominations closes.

(1.7) (a) In the case of any metropolitan district that was organized after January 1, 2000, in accordance with title 32, the notice required by subsection (1) of this section must be made by e-mailing the notice to each active registered elector of the metropolitan district as specified in the registration list provided by the county clerk and recorder as of the date that is one hundred fifty days prior to the date of the regular local government election. Where the active registered elector does not have an e-mail address on file for such purpose with the county clerk and recorder as of the date that is not later than one hundred fifty days prior to the date of the regular local government election, the public notice required by subsection (1) of this section must be made by mailing the notice, at the lowest cost option, to each address at which one or more active registered electors of the metropolitan district resides as specified in the registration list provided by the county clerk and recorder as of the date that is one hundred fifty days prior to the date of the regular local government election.

In addition to the public notice required by subsection (1.7)(a) of this section, the designated election official shall also provide public notice by any one of the following means:

Publication as defined in subsection (2) of this section;

Including the notice as a prominent part of a newsletter, annual report, billing insert, billing statement, letter, voter information card or other notice of election, or other informational mailing sent by the metropolitan district to the eligible electors of the metropolitan district;

Posting the information on the official website of the metropolitan district; or

For a metropolitan district with fewer than one thousand eligible electors that is wholly located within a county, the population of which is less than thirty thousand people, posting the notice in at least three public places within the territorial boundaries of the metropolitan district and, in addition, posting a notice in the office of the clerk and recorder of the county in which the special district is located. Any such notices must remain posted until the day after the call for nominations closes.

As used in this section, "publication" means printing one time, in one newspaper of general circulation in the special district or proposed special district if there is such a newspaper, and, if not, then in a newspaper in the county in which the special district or proposed special district is located. For a special district with territory within more than one county, if publication cannot be made in one newspaper of general circulation in the special district, then one publication is required in a newspaper in each county in which the special district is located and in which the special district also has fifty or more eligible electors.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 16, § 6, effective February 18.

L. 2021:

(1) amended and (1.5) and (1.7) added, (SB 21-262), ch. 368, p. 2425, § 1, effective September 7.

1-13.5-502. Notice of election.

The designated election official, at least twenty days before each local government election, shall give written notice of the election stating the date of the election and the location and hours during which the polls will be open; the date ballots have or may be mailed if the election is conducted by mail ballot; mail ballot drop-off locations; names of the officers to be elected and any ballot issues and ballot questions to be voted upon; and the names of those candidates whose nominations have been certified to the designated election official, which listing must be as nearly as possible in the form in which such nominations will appear upon the official ballot. For an independent mail ballot election, the notice does not need to include the text of the ballot issues or ballot questions. A copy of the notice must be posted until after the election in a conspicuous place in the office of the designated election official. A copy of the notice must be mailed or sent via electronic mail to the county clerk and recorder.

In addition, the notice required by this section must be published in at least one newspaper having general circulation in the local government on or before the twentieth day before election day.

On or before the twentieth day before the election, a special district must effect publication of the notice as provided in section 1-13.5-1102.

All polling places must be designated by a sign conspicuously posted at least twenty days before each local government election. The sign must be substantially in the following form: "Polling Place for (name of local government)". In addition, the sign must state the date of the next election and the hours the polling place will be open.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 17, § 6, effective February 18.

1-13.5-503. Ballot issue notice.

Any ballot issue notice relating to a local government ballot issue must be prepared and distributed in a manner consistent with part 9 of article 7 of this title.

In addition to the requirements set forth in subsection (1) of this section, a local government submitting a ballot issue concerning the creation of any debt or other financial obligation at an election in the local government must post notice in accordance with the requirements of section 1-7-908.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 17, § 6, effective February 18.

1-13.5-504. Establishing precincts and polling places - applicability.

This section applies to local government elections that are conducted by polling place.

The governing body of each local government, or designated election official if authorized by the governing body, shall divide the local government into as many election precincts for local government elections as it deems expedient for the convenience of the electors of the local government and shall designate the location and address for each polling place at which elections are to be held.

The designated election officials of local governments with overlapping boundaries that hold elections the same day by polling place must meet, confer, and thereafter, if practical, hold such elections in a manner that permits an elector in the overlapping area to vote in all of such elections at one polling place.

Notwithstanding subsection (3) of this section, the governing body or designated election official shall change any polling place upon petition of a majority of the registered electors residing within the local government.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 18, § 6, effective February 18.

1-13.5-504.5. Accessibility of polling places to persons with disabilities.

Each polling place shall comply fully with the current "ADA standards for accessible design" set forth in 28 CFR 36 and promulgated in accordance with the federal "Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990", as amended, 42 U.S.C. sec. 12101 et seq., and no barrier shall impede the path of electors with disabilities to the voting booth.

Emergency polling places are exempt from compliance with this section.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section, a designated election official shall only select as polling places such sites that meet the standards of accessibility set forth in subsection (1) of this section.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 18, § 6, effective February 18.

1-13.5-505. Judges may change polling places.

When it becomes impossible or inconvenient to hold an election at the place designated, the election judges, after notifying the designated election official and after having assembled at or as near as practicable to such place and before receiving any vote, may move to the nearest convenient place for holding the election and at such newly designated place proceed with the election.

Upon moving to a new polling place, the judges shall prominently display a proclamation of the change and may station a proper person at the original polling place to notify all persons appearing at the original polling place of the new location for holding the election.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 18, § 6, effective February 18.

1-13.5-506. Number of voting booths, voting machines, or voting systems.

In local governments that use paper ballots, the governing body shall provide in each polling place a sufficient number of voting booths. Each voting booth shall be situated so as to permit an eligible elector to prepare his or her ballot screened from observation and shall be furnished with such supplies and conveniences as will enable the eligible elector to prepare his or her ballot for voting.

In local governments that use voting machines, the governing body shall supply each polling place with a sufficient number of voting machines.

In local governments that use an electronic voting system, the governing body shall provide adequate materials and equipment for the orderly conduct of voting.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 19, § 6, effective February 18.

1-13.5-507. Arrangement of voting machines or voting booths and ballot boxes.

The voting machines or the voting booths and ballot box must be situated in the polling place in plain view of the election officials and watchers. No person other than the election officials and those admitted for the purpose of voting are permitted within the immediate voting area, which is the area within six feet of the voting machines or the voting booths and ballot box, except by authority of the election judges, and then only when necessary to keep order and enforce the law.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 19, § 6, effective February 18.

1-13.5-508. Election expenses to be paid by local government.

The cost of conducting a local government election, including the cost of printing and supplies, is to be paid by the local government for which the election is being held.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 19, § 6, effective February 18.

1-13.5-509. Failure to receive mailed notice.

Any election for which a notice was mailed shall not be invalidated on the grounds that an eligible elector did not receive the ballot issue notice, mailed information, or mailed notification of the election required by law or the state constitution if the designated election official acted in good faith in making the mailing. Good faith is presumed if the designated election official or coordinated election official mailed the ballot issue notice, information, or notification to the addresses appearing on a registration list for the local government as provided by the county clerk and recorder, and, where applicable, the property owners list for the local government provided by the county assessor.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 19, § 6, effective February 18.

1-13.5-510. Court-ordered elections.

When an election is ordered by the court for a special district, the court shall authorize the designated election official to give notice, and take such other actions, as provided in the order.

For an organizational election, the notice by publication must include the purposes of the election, the estimated operating and debt service mill levies and fiscal year spending for the first year following organization, and the boundaries of the special district. The notice by publication must recite the election date, which shall be not less than twenty days after publication of the election notice.

For a dissolution election, the notice by publication must include the plan for dissolution or a summary of the plan and the place where a member of the public may inspect or obtain a copy of the complete plan. The notice by publication must recite the election date, which must be not less than twenty days after publication of the election notice.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 19, § 6, effective February 18.

L. 2016:

(1) amended, (HB 16-1442), ch. 313, p. 1267, § 5, effective August 10.

1-13.5-511. Certification of ballot.

No later than sixty days before any election, the designated election official of each local government that intends to conduct an election shall certify the order of the ballot and ballot content. The order of the ballot and ballot content must include the name and office of each candidate for whom a petition or self-nomination form or letter has been filed with the designated election official and any ballot issues or ballot questions to be submitted to the eligible electors.

After a designated election official has certified the order of the ballot and ballot content in accordance with subsection (1) of this section, the designated election official may recertify the ballot if:

A candidate withdraws from a race, and the withdrawal would not change the order that the candidate names appear on the ballot as previously determined by the lot drawing; or

There are technical revisions to a ballot issue or ballot question prior to the ballots being printed.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 20, § 6, effective February 18.

L. 2016:

Entire section amended, (HB 16-1442), ch. 313, p. 1267, § 6, effective August 10.

1-13.5-512. Correction of errors.

The designated election official shall, on his or her own motion, correct without delay any error in publication of sample or official ballots that he or she discovers or that is brought to his or her attention and that can be corrected without interfering with the timely distribution of the ballots.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 20, § 6, effective February 18.

1-13.5-513. Election may be canceled - when.

If the only matter before the electors in a nonpartisan election is the election of persons to office and if, at the close of business on the sixty-third day before the election or at any time thereafter, there are not more candidates than offices to be filled at the election, including candidates filing affidavits of intent to be a write-in candidate, the designated election official, if instructed by resolution of the governing body, shall cancel the election and declare the candidates elected.

No later than twenty-five days before an election conducted as a coordinated election in November, and at any time prior to any other elections, a governing body may by resolution withdraw one or more ballot issues or ballot questions from the ballot. In such case, the ballot issues and ballot questions are deemed to have not been submitted and votes cast on the ballot issues and ballot questions will either not be counted or be deemed invalid by action of the governing body.

If the electors are to consider the election of persons to office and ballot issues or ballot questions, the election may be canceled by the governing body only in the event that all of the conditions of subsection (1) of this section exist and that all ballot issues or ballot questions have been withdrawn from the ballot pursuant to subsection (2) of this section.

Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, no election may be canceled in part.

Unless otherwise provided by an intergovernmental agreement pursuant to section 1-7-116, upon receipt of an invoice, the governing body shall within thirty days promptly pay all costs accrued by the county clerk and recorder and any applicable political subdivision attributable to the canceled election or withdrawn ballot issues or ballot questions.

The governing body or designated election official shall provide notice by publication, as that term is defined in section 1-13.5-501, of the cancellation of the election. A copy of the notice must be posted at each polling location of the local government, in the office of the designated election official, and in the office of the clerk and recorder for each county with territorial boundaries that overlap in whole or in part with those of the local government and, for special districts, a copy of the notice must be filed in the office of the division of local government. The governing body shall also notify the candidates that the election was canceled and that they were elected by acclamation.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 20, § 6, effective February 18.